Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1246
Joint bridge commission; property; title; in whom vested; disagreements; arbitration.

Title to all real and personal property and to the completed bridge and all its appurtenances and incidents shall vest in the political subdivisions cooperating as tenants in common in the same proportion as the contributions made to the joint fund. In the event of the inability of the governing bodies of the political subdivisions cooperating or their joint commission to agree, the specific controversy may be submitted to arbitration in such manner as may be agreed upon.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 22, p. 630;

C.S.1929, § 14-1222;

R.S.1943, § 14-1246.